Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1504.01
Hearing instrument specialist, defined.

Hearing instrument specialist means a person who engages in the practice of ordering the use and fitting of hearing instruments.

Laws 2025, LB332, § 14.